dictsource/de_rules
        pake (t    p%ake:
        papier	pap'i:r
     _) para (@    p,ara
        passagie   pasaZ'i:
        path (_	p'At
        pathin (_	p'AtIn
        pathisch (_	p'A:tIS
     _) peri       p,e:ri:
     _) perio      p,e:rIo:
     _) periphe    p,e:ri:fe:
     _) personen (@P8 pErz'o:n@n
        person     p%Erzo:n
        persön     p%ErzY:n
        prüf	pry:f
        philie     f'i:li:
     _) photo      f,o:to:
     _) pro (@     %pro:
     _) probe      pro:b@

        po (em     p%o:
        po (et     p%o:
        poesie     po:e:z'i:
     _) poly (@P4  p,o:ly:
     _) polygon (@P7 po:ly:g'o:n
        partei     p%artaI
     _) perfe (k   p%ErfE
     _) polik      p'o:li:k
     _) po (lit    p%o:
        pool       _^_EN
        power      paU@r
     _) preß (@P4  pr'Es
     _) primär (P6 pri:m'E:r
     _) prinzipien (@P9 prInts'i:pI@
     _) privat (@P6 pri:v'A:t
        problem    pr%o:ble:m
     _) psycho (@P6 ps,y:Co:
     _) psycho (ti psy:C'o:
     _) pu (e      p%u:


.group q
     _) q (_       ku:
        q          k
        qu         kv
     @) que (_     =k
     @) quen (_    =k@n


.group r
     _) r (_       Er
        r          r
        r (r 
     b) r          r    // uses phonemes @-*
     _) rh (A      r    // allow _rh

        rangier    rA:NZ'i:r
     _) re (d      re:
        register	re:g'Ist@r
        reichisch	raICIS
        ressourc   rEs'Urs
        revers     r%e:vErs


.group s
     _) s (_       Es
        s          s
        s (A       z
        s (_NS1    s
        s (_       z         // suffix has been removed
     A) s (_N      s
     A) s (_       z
        ss         s
        sst (@     sSt

     _) s (cA      s    // allow _sc
     _) s (cr      s    // allow _scr
     _) sch (A     S
     _) sch (L01A  S
     _) sch (mA    S
     _) sch (nA    S
     _) sch (w     S
     _) sh (A      S
     _) sh (rA     S
     _) s (kA      s    // allow _sk
     _) s (kL01A   s    // allow _skl _skr
     _) s (lA      s
     _) s (mA      s
     _) s (nA      s
     _) s (pA      S
     _) s (phA     s
     _) s (plA     S
     _) s (plend   s
     _) s (prA     S
     _) s (quA     s
     _) s (tA      S
     _) s (trA     S
     _) s (ve      s
     _) s (wA      s
     _) s (zA      s

        sch        S
        schenk	SENk
        sh (K      S
        sou (nd    saU
     p) s (a       s
     p) s (i       s
     t) s (i       s
     k) s (i       s
   _be) sp         Sp
   _ge) sp         Sp
  _ver) sp         Sp
        sp (an     Sp
        sp (eich   Sp
        sp (err    Sp
        sph        sf
        sp (iel    Sp
        sp (r      Sp
    &C) st (_S2    st
    &C) ste (_S3   st@
    &C) stem (_S4  st@m
    &C) sten (_S4  st@n
    &C) ster (_S4  st3
    &C) stes (_S4  st@s
    &n) st (_      st       // needs more work

//   _be) st         St   // don't need these because 'be' is removed as a prefix
//   _ge) st         St
//  _ver) st         St
        ste (ll    StE
     a) ste (ll    stE
        st (ah     St
        st (art    St
        st (ä      St
        st (eh     St
        stein (_	StaIn
        st (ö      St
        st (rich   St
        st (ü      St
        st (uf	St
        st (uh     St
        st (ung    st

        sachse	zaks@
     &) sächsisch	zEksIS
     _) safe       _^_EN
     &) schaft (_S6 Saft

     ä) schen      sC@n      // but not wäschen
    wä) schen      S@n
    fe) schen      sC@n
    ie) schen      sC@n
     h) schen      sC@n
     ö) schen      sC@n      // but not löschen
    lö) schen      S@n
    rö) schen      S@n
    äu) schen      sC@n      // but not täuschen
   täu) schen      S@n

        schein (lich S'aIn
        schreibung	Sr,aIbUN
     _) schul (@P5 S'u:l
     _) schul (d   S'Ul

        schwer     Sve:r
        screen     _^_EN
     _) sechs (P5  z'Eks
        seku (nden ze:k'U
     _) selbst (@@P6 z'Elpst
        service (_S7 z%Ervi:s
        shop       _^_EN
     _) sky        _^_EN
        soldat     z%OldA:t
     &) so (rt_    s_|O
        summe      zUm@

        speed      _^_EN
  stau) ss         s
     _) st (ilA    st
     @) straße (_S6 str,A:s@
     _) street     _^_EN
        style      _^_EN
        süd (L04st z%y:t
        süd (west  z%y:t
        synthesi   _^_EN
        system     z%yste:m
        s (system  s


.group t
     _) t (_       te:
        t          t
     t) t
        th	t
     bra) th (ering	t,h
     _) th (A      t   // allow _th
     _) th (rA     t   // allow _thr
        th (K      t
     K) th         t
     _) t (rA      t   // allow  _tr
     _) tsch (A    tS
     _) t (setse   t
     _) tw (A      tw
        tz         ts

    &t) te (_      @
//         &t) ten (_       @n

   ier) t (_S1     t
   ier) te (_S2    t@
   ier) tem (_S3   t@m
   ier) ten (_S3   t@n
   ier) ter (_S3   t3
   ier) tes (_S3   t@s
   ier) tet (_S3   t@t
   ier) tere (_S4  t@r@
   ier) terem (_S5 t@r@m
   ier) teren (_S5 t@r@n
   ier) terer (_S5 t@r3
   ier) teres (_S5 t@r@s
   ier) tst (_S3   tst
   ier) tste (_S4  tst@
   ier) tstem (_S5 tst@m
   ier) tsten (_S5 tst@n
   ier) tster (_S5 tst3
   ier) tstes (_S5 tst@s
   ier) test (_S4  t@st
   ier) teste (_S5 t@st@
   ier) testem (_S6 t@st@m
   ier) testen (_S6 t@st@n
   ier) tester (_S6 t@st3
   ier) testes (_S6 t@st@s

     _) talent     tal'Ent
        talk		_^_EN
        tch        tS
        t (chen_   t
     _) teen       _^_EN
     _) tele (@    t,e:le:
     _) thermo     tErmo:
     &) thek	t'e:k
             &) thekar	te:k'A:r
      &) thekarin 	te:k'ArIn
     &) thekerin 	t'e:k@rIn
       top	tOp
        toph	tOf
        touch      _^_EN
        tuerei (_  tu:@r'aI
        thrill     _^_EN
   _pa) th         t
        the (era   te:
     _) tief (@P4  t'i:f
     @) tient (_   tsj'Ent
     @) tion       tsj,o:n
     @) tion (_    tsj'o:n
     _) trail      _^_EN
     _) tranqu     _^_EN
        translat	_^_EN
        traver     tr%avEr
     _) tw         _^_EN


.group u
     _) u (_       u:
        u          u:
        uh (+      u:
        uell       u:'El
        u (e       u:
     r) ue (_      u:@
     t) ue (_      u:@
        ue (_      'y:

        u (C%      U
        u (CC      U
        u (sch     U
        u (x       U
     @) u (ng      U

        ub (t_     u:p
        ug (t_     u:k
        ur (_	'u:r
     _) ueber (@P5 _|,y:b3
     _) um (@P2    'Um
     _) umbe (@P4  'Umb@
     _) umge (@P4  'Umg@
     _) umge (b    Umg'e:
     _) um (orgP2  'Um
     _) um (stAP2  'Um
     @) u (m_      U
    rt) u (m_      u:
     _) un         Un
     _) un (@P2    _|'Un
     _) unab (@P4  _|,Un_|ap
     _) unan (@P4  _|'Un_|an
     _) unauf (@P5 _|'Un_|aUf
     _) unaus (@P5 _|'Un_|aUs
     _) unbe (@P4  _|'Unb@
     _) unein (@P5 _|'Un_|aIn
     _) unge (@P4  _|'Ung@
     _) unver (@P5 _|'UnfEr
     _) un (i      u:n
        univer (s   ,u:ni:vEr
     _) universitäts (P12 u:ni:vErzi:t'E:ts
     _) un (in@P2  _|'Un
     _) unum (@P4  _|'Un_|Um
     _) under      _^_EN
     _) unter (@P5 _|,Unt3
     _) unter (eX  Unt@r


   rep) u (bl      u:
     s) u (ch      u:
     &) uela (_    u:,e:la
     @) uerisch (_ 'u:rIS
     _) ultra (@P5 ,Ultra
        um (_      Um
     t) um (_      u:m
     &) ungs (A    %UNs_|    // upto "ungs" is a prefix?
        u (pt_     'U
     _) u (rk      u:
     _) u (rl      u:
     _) u (rv      u:
        us (_      Us
    _d) u (sch     u:
     _) user       _^_EN
    Al) u (t_      u:



.group v
     _) v (_       faU
        v          v
     v) v 
        v (_N      f
     _) v (A       v

     _) v (lad     v
     _) v (lies    f
     _) v (ri      f

     _) vie        fi:
     _) vi (CC     vI
     _) vi         vi:

        vater      fA:t3
        väter      fE:t3
     _) v (ati_    f
     _) v (ät      f
     _) v (ie      f
     _) v (iet     v
     _) v (iz      f
        v (og      f
        v (oll     f
        v (olk     f
        v (ölC     f
     _) v (on      f

     _) vehe       ve:he:
        velv (er   vElv
     _) ver (@P3   f%Er
        v (er      f
    _A) v (er      v
     a) v (er      v
    ad) ve (r      vE
    re) v (er      v
     i) v (er      v
     o) v (er      v
     u) v (er      v
   kon) ve (r      vE
   per) ve (r      vE
   sub) ve (r      vE
 trans) ve (r      vE
     _) ve (rbal   vE
     _) ve (rbos   v%E
     _) ve (rsat   vE
     _) ve (rsie   vE
     _) ve (rsif   vE
     _) ve (rsion  vE
     _) ve (rteb   vE
        ve (rti    vE
        ver (tief  f%Er
     @) versich    fErz,IC
     @) vergess    fErg,Es
        ver (bind  f%Er
        ver (dien  f%Er
        ver (sicht f%Er
     @) verfahren (_S9 fErf,A:r@n
     _) viel (@P4  f'i:l
     _) vier (g@P4 f'i:r
     _) viet       vIEt
     _) volks      fOlks
     _) voll (C@P4 f'Ol
     _) voll (br   f%Ol
     _) voll (end  f%Ol_|
     _) voll (ko   f%Ol
     _) voll (stre f%Ol
     _) voll (z    f%Ol
        vorder     fOrd3
     -) vorha (nd  fo:rh'a
     _) vor (ne    'fo:r
     _) vor (n     fOr

     _) vor (@P3   'fo:r
     C) vor        fo:r
     _) voraus (P6 fo:r'aUs
     _) vorbei (P6 fo:r'baI
     _) vorher (P6 fo:rh'e:r
     _) vorüber (P7 fo:r'y:b3


.group w
     _) w (_       ve:
        w          v
     _) wh (A      v
     _) w (lad     v
     _) w (rA      v

     @) wert (_    ve:rt
     _) wh         _^_EN
     &) ware (_    _^_EN
     _) wasch (@P5 v'aS
     _) wasser (@P6 v'as@r
     _) weit (C@P4 v'aIt
     _) weiter (@P6 v'aIt@r
        weiterung	vaIt@rUN
     _) weither    vaIthe:r
        welch	vElC
        wetter	vEt3
     _) wieder (@P6 vi:d3
        willkommen	v%IlkOm@n
     _) wo (hin    v%o:
     _) wovor      vo:f'o:r
     _) wohl (@P4  v'o:l
        work       _^_EN
        württem (berg	vyrt@m


.group x
     _) x (_       Iks
        x          ks


.group y
     _) y (_       ypsIlOn

        y          y:
        y (CC      y
        y (x       y
     _) y (A       j
     A) y (A       j
     @) y (_       i:
     t) y (_       _^_EN

.group z
     _) z (_       tsEt
        z          ts
        z (z
     _) z (den     z
     _) z (wA      ts   // allow _zw

     _) zentral (@P7 tsEntr'A:l
     _) zentral (i tsEntral
     _) zer (@P3   tsEr
     _) zere (b    tse:re:
     _) zere (m    tse:re:
    kon) zert	ts'Ert
        ziell      tsj'El
     _) zie (ge@P3 ts'i:
        zitat      tsi:t'A:t
     _) zeit (@P4  ts'aIt
     _) ziel (@P4  ts'i:l
     _) zier (@P4  ts'i:r
     _) zigaretten (@P10 tsi:gar'Et@n
     _) zigeu      tsi:g'OY
     _) zu (C@P2   ts%u:
     _) zu (ck     tsU
     _) zu (eP2    ts%u:
     _) zu (g@     tsu:
     _) zu (gu@P2  ts%u:
     _) zu (nC     tsU
     _) zurück (@P6 tsu:r'yk
     _) zusammen (@P8  tsu:z'am@n
     _) zyklo (@P5 ,tsy:klo:
        zylin      ts%i:lIn


.group ä
        ä          E:
        äh (+      E:
        äu         OY

        ä (C%      E
   schw) äch         EC
   spr) äch         E:C
        ä (CC      E
        ä (sch     E

        äb (t_     E:p
        äg (t_     E:k
        är (_	'E:r
     t) ät (_      'E:t
        ä (um_N    'E:


.group ö
        ö          Y:
        öh (+      Y:

        ö (_       'Y:
        ö (C%      W
        ö (CC      W
        ö (sch     W
        öster	Y:st3r


.group ü
        ü          y:
        üh (+      y:

        ü (C%      y
        ü (CC      y
        ü (sch     y
        ü (x       y

        üb (t_     y:p
        üg (t_     y:k

     _) über (@P4  _|,y:b3
     _) über (be@P4 _!'y:b3
     _) über (gangs y:b3
        übrig      y:brIg#


.group ß
     _) ß (_       EstsEt
        ß          s


.group
        é          e:
        ée         'e:
        é (_       'e:
        æ          E
        ø          W
        ç          s
        č          tS
        š          S
        ž          Z

        , (D       kOma
        $          dOl'A:

    __) - (_D      mi:nUs
    D_) - (_D      StrIC
     _) - (_D      _

 _L05_) : (_L06D_  %u:r // Say time
